Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1733.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; senior facilities; tribal nations; exemption A. The sum of $20,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security to distribute as grants to the following entities for surveying, designing, planning, constructing and operating senior citizen centers, senior assisted living centers and home care facilities: 1. Twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection to the Navajo Nation. 2. Twenty-five percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection to the Hopi Tribe. 3. Fifty percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection to the remaining twenty federally recognized tribal nations in this state. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.